Utah statutes.
48-2c-707 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Classes of members.

(1)  The articles of organization or operating agreement of a company may provide for classes or groups of members having such relative rights, powers, and duties as prescribed therein, and may make provision for the future creation of any such classes or groups.

(2)  Except as provided in Subsection 48-2c-803(2), the articles of organization or operating agreement may provide for the taking of an action, including the amendment of the operating agreement, without the vote or approval of any member or class or group of members and may provide that any particular class or group shall have no voting rights.



Amended by Chapter 193, 2002 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

